Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Correctional Industries Work Programs

§ 47-5-501.
Legislative intent.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, it is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature to provide vocational education and training for offenders in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and simultaneously reimburse the state for the expenses of incarcerating such offenders. To implement this goal, the Legislature intends for the Department of Corrections to work in conjunction with private industry to locate viable industries and businesses on property utilized by the State Prison Correctional System and utilize offenders in the custody of the Department of Corrections as the labor force necessary to conduct their operations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-503.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 534, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1990).

[Laws, 1983, 409, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 23]

§ 47-5-505.
Selection and evaluation of suitable industries; negotiation of leases and other agreements; ratification.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the Department of Economic Development, and the Mississippi State University Cooperative Extension Service shall collaborate with the Department of Corrections in an initial evaluation of viable industries and businesses readily found in the present economy and a determination of which of these would effectively function within the correctional industries work program. Special consideration shall be given to those industries and businesses which will provide vocational education and training for offenders so as to assist offenders in functioning more successfully following their release from custody.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, in conjunction with the initial evaluation and determination described in subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Economic Development shall have the primary responsibility of identifying and evaluating acceptable industries and businesses and of acting as an agent of the Department of Corrections by communicating with such concerns and aggressively soliciting their participation in the correctional industries work program.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, after an acceptable industry or business has expressed an interest in participating in the correctional industries work program, the Department of Corrections shall negotiate any necessary contractual agreements and arrangements between the concern and the Department of Corrections, including (a) leases of up to twenty-five (25) years, renewable at the option of the lessee for an additional ten-year period at the end of each lease term, of any property utilized by the state prison correctional system, and (b) authorization for such industry or business to develop leased property in a manner necessary to conduct the operation or project.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, any contracts concerning the leasing of real property by the Board of Corrections, any rules and regulations promulgated by the board and the making of any contract by the Department of Corrections with any private business shall be ratified and approved by the Governor’s Office of General Services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 409, §§ 3, 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 230; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 24; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-507.
Vocational training of offenders; employment subsequent to release.

The participating industry or business shall be responsible for providing the offenders with any vocational education or training necessary for employment. Upon an offender’s release from custody, the participating industry or business may offer such offender a similar employment opportunity at a free-world location or facility operated by the industry or business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 47-5-509.
Security for facilities; employment status of offenders.

The department of corrections shall at all times be responsible for the security of the facility being used for the operation or project. No offender granted privileges under the provisions of Section 47-5-501 et seq. shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the participating industry or business while working in the correctional industries work program, or while going to and from employment or other specified areas.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 47-5-511.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 534, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1990).

[Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 6]

§ 47-5-513.
Disposition of funds received.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, proceeds of funds paid by industries or businesses participating in the correctional industries work program shall be paid into the special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Corrections for the operating expenses of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-515.
Work training programs for offenders in trades for which there is a shortage of workers; cooperation with private industry.

The Department of Corrections shall establish work training programs in conjunction with private industry to provide training to offenders in those trades in which there is a shortage of workers.

The commissioner may cooperate with private industry for the establishment of work training programs.

Private industry shall provide the training at state correctional facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 567, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 47-5-517.
Work program for data processing entry at Central Mississippi Correctional Facility.

The Department of Corrections shall contract with the Department of Economic and Community Development for a training and work program for inmates to perform data processing entry at the Central Mississippi Correctional Facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 586, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 22, 1999.